Utah statutes.
31A-8a-102.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Fee" means any periodic charge for use of a discount program.

(2)  "Health care provider" means a health care provider as defined in Section 78B-3-403 who:

(a)  is practicing within the scope of the provider's license; and

(b)  has agreed either directly or indirectly, by contract or any other arrangement with a health discount program operator, to provide a discount to enrollees of a health discount program.

(3)  "Health discount program" means a business arrangement or contract in which a person pays fees, dues, charges, or other consideration in exchange for a program that provides access to health care providers who agree to provide a discount for health care services.

(4)  "Operates a health discount program" or "health discount program operator" means to:

(a)  enter into a contract or agreement either directly or indirectly with a health care provider in this state which the health care provider agrees to provide discounts to enrollees of the health discount program;

(b)  enter into a contract or agreement either directly or indirectly with a person in this state to provide access to more than one health care provider who has agreed to provide discounts for medical services to enrollees of the health discount program;

(c)  sell or distribute a health discount program in this state; or

(d)  place your name on and market or promote a health discount program in this state.

(5)  "Value-added benefit" means a discount offering with no additional charge made by a health insurer or health maintenance organization that is licensed under this title, in connection with existing contracts with the health insurer or health maintenance organization.

